Connecticut, session 2026, SB00495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 17b-337 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) There shall be established a Long-Term Care Planning Committee
for the purpose of exchanging information on long-term care issues,
coordinating policy development and establishing a long-term care plan
for all persons in need of long-term care. Such policy and plan shall
provide that individuals with long-term care needs have the option to
choose and receive long-term care and support in the least restrictive,
appropriate setting. Such plan shall integrate the three components of a
long-term care system including home and community-based services,
supportive housing arrangements and nursing facilities. Such plan shall
include: (1) A vision and mission statement for a long-term care system;
(2) the current number of persons receiving services; (3) the current
number of persons receiving long-term care supports and services in the
sSB495 / File No. 484 1

sSB495 File No. 484
community and the number receiving such supports and services in
institutions; (4) demographic data concerning such persons by service
type; (5) the current aggregate cost of such system of services; (6)
forecasts of future demand for services; (7) the type of services available
and the amount of funds necessary to meet the demand; (8) projected
costs for programs associated with such system; (9) strategies to
promote the partnership for long-term care program; (10) resources
necessary to accomplish goals for the future; (11) funding sources
available; and (12) the number and types of providers needed to deliver
services. The plan shall address how changes in one component of such
long-term care system impact other components of such system.
(b) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall, within available
appropriations, study issues relative to long-term care including, but
not limited to: [, the] (1) State models for financing of long-term care,
including, but not limited to, payroll deductions for long-term care, (2)
best practices for workforce retention, workforce wages and workforce
standards, (3) projected federal support for long-term care and solutions
for insufficient federal funding, (4) the case-mix system of Medicaid
reimbursement, (5) community-based service options, (6) access to long-
term care and geriatric psychiatric services, [. The committee shall
evaluate issues relative to] (7) long-term care in light of the United States
Supreme Court decision, Olmstead v. L.C., 119 S. Ct. 2176 (1999),
requiring states to place persons with disabilities in community settings
rather than in institutions when such placement is appropriate, the
transfer to a less restrictive setting is not opposed by such persons and
such placement can be reasonably accommodated, [. The committee,
within available appropriations, shall evaluate] and (8) available data
on the average net actual Medicaid expenditures for nursing homes, in
comparison to average net actual Medicaid expenditures for home and
community-based services waiver participants who require a nursing
home level of care. [, including the number of individuals served, to
assist in short-term and long-term Medicaid expenditure forecasting.]
(c) The Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall consist of: (1) The
chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing committees of
sSB495 / File No. 484 2

sSB495 File No. 484
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services, public health [, elderly services and long-term care] and aging;
(2) the Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's designee;
(3) [one member of the Office of Policy and Management appointed by]
the Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
designee, who shall serve as a chairperson; (4) [one member from the
Department of Public Health appointed by] the Commissioner of Public
Health, or the commissioner's designee; (5) [one member from the
Department of Housing appointed by] the Commissioner of Housing,
or the commissioner's designee; (6) [one member from the Department
of Developmental Services appointed by] the Commissioner of
Developmental Services, or the commissioner's designee; (7) [one
member from the Department of Mental Health and Addiction Services
appointed by] the Commissioner of Mental Health and Addiction
Services, or the commissioner's designee; (8) [one member from the
Department of Transportation appointed by] the Commissioner of
Transportation, or the commissioner's designee; (9) [one member from
the Department of Children and Families appointed by] the
Commissioner of Children and Families, or the commissioner's
designee; (10) [one member from] a representative of the Health
Systems Planning Unit of the Office of Health Strategy appointed by the
Commissioner of Health Strategy; [and] (11) [one member from the
Department of Aging and Disability Services appointed by] the
Commissioner of Aging and Disability Services, [. The committee shall
convene no later than ninety days after June 4, 1998] or the
commissioner's designee; (12) the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, or the
ombudsman's designee; (13) a representative of an employee
organization representing long-term care workers, appointed by the
committee chairpersons; and (14) a representative of an organization
representing retirees, appointed by the committee chairpersons. Any
vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. [The chairperson
shall be elected from among the members of the committee.] Members
shall elect a Senate chairperson and a House chairperson from among
the members appointed pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection,
who shall serve as chairpersons of the committee along with the
sSB495 / File No. 484 3

sSB495 File No. 484
Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
designee. The committee shall seek the advice and participation of any
person, organization or state or federal agency it deems necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
(d) Not later than January [1, 2018, and annually thereafter] first
annually, the Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall submit a
report and recommendations to the joint standing committees of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to aging and
human services on the [number of persons receiving (1)] issues the
committee studies pursuant to subsection (b) of this section. The report
shall include a listing of long-term care supports and services in the
community [;] and [(2)] long-term care supports and services in
institutions.
(e) Not later than January 1, 1999, and every three years thereafter,
the Long-Term Care Planning Committee shall submit a long-term care
plan pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the joint standing
100 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
101 relating to human services, public health [, elderly services and long-
102 term care] and aging, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a,
103 and such plan shall serve as a guide for the actions of state agencies in
104 developing and modifying programs that serve persons in need of long-
105 term care.
106 (f) Any state agency, when developing or modifying any program
107 that, in whole or in part, provides assistance or support to persons with
108 long-term care needs, shall, to the maximum extent feasible, include
109 provisions that support care-giving provided by family members and
110 other informal caregivers and promote consumer-directed care.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17b-337
sSB495 / File No. 484 4

sSB495 File No. 484
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title was changed; in Subsec. (b), "issues relative to" was bracketed
for consistency; in Subsec. (c), "cochairperson" and "cochairpersons"
were changed to "chairperson" and "chairpersons" and the sentence
concerning the House and Senate chairpersons was redrafted for
consistency.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB495 / File No. 484 5

sSB495 File No. 484
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Potential Potential Potential
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill changes the requirements of the Long-Term Care Planning
Committee (LTCPC) within the Office of Policy and Management
(OPM) to (1) include a study of certain financing models, best practices,
and projected federal support, and (2) remove a requirement to include
certain information in studies related to other long-term care related
topics. This results in a potential cost to OPM beginning in FY 27 to the
extent an additional position is required to complete these studies. The
cost is dependent on the level of analysis conducted.
The bill also makes changes to the membership of the LTCPC which
does not result in a fiscal impact.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB495 / File No. 484 6

sSB495 File No. 484
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 495
AN ACT EXPANDING THE MEMBERSHIP AND STUDY FOCUS OF
THE LONG-TERM CARE PLANNING COMMITTEE.